Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-909
Department; gather information; encourage scientific investigation.

The Department of Correctional Services shall gather demographic information for statistical reporting purposes, shall encourage scientific investigation of the treatment of delinquency and crime, shall provide forms for statistical returns to be made by the institutions in their annual reports, and shall supervise the methods of care, treatment, education, and improvement of the inmates of the institutions under its control.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 61;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 70;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 46;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 66.